Utah statutes.
32B-1-207.   Calculation of ratio of gross receipts of food to alcoholic product.

In calculating the annual gross receipts of a retail license or sublicense for purposes of determining the percentage of gross receipts from the sale, offer for sale, or furnishing of food or an alcoholic product, a retail licensee may not include in the calculation the money from the sale of a bottle of wine by the retail licensee or under a sublicense that is in excess of $250.



Enacted by Chapter 334, 2011 General Session

